Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0618

Standards of conduct and liability.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 23.100.0620:

(1) The discharge of the duties of a director or member of a committee of the board of directors is governed by the law applicable to directors of entities organized under Title 23B RCW; and

(2) The liability of a director or member of a committee of the board of directors is governed by the law applicable to directors of entities organized under Title 23B RCW.

[ 2019 c 37 s 618.]